Wyoming, session 2025, HB0178.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-2-111 is amended to read:

22-2-111. Employees time off to vote.

(a) Any person entitled to vote at any primary or
general election or special election to fill a vacancy in
HB0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0642
the office of representatives in the congress of the United
States is, on the day of such the election or upon request
during the period of early voting, entitled to absent
himself from any service or employment in which he is then
engaged or employed for a period of one (1) hour two (2)
hours, other than meal hours, the hour hours being at the
convenience of the employer, between the time of opening
and closing of the polls during a period that the elector
has the ability to cast a vote. Such elector shall not,
because of so absenting himself, lose any pay, providing he
actually casts his legal vote.

(b) This section shall not apply to an employee who
has three (3) or more consecutive nonworking hours during
the time the polls are open on the day of the election.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0178